src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2
+Sg2:%>неть K ;
+Der/Cmpr+Sg2:%>шка%>неть K ;
+Sg2+Ill:%>незэть K ;

LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3
+Sg3:%>нензэ K ;
+Der/Cmpr+Sg3:%>шка%>нензэ K ;
+Sg3+Ill:%>незэнзэ K ;

LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1
+Pl1:%>ненек K ;
+Der/Cmpr+Pl1:%>шка%>ненек K ;
+Pl1+Ill:%>незэнек K ;

LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2
+Pl2:%>ненк K ;
+Der/Cmpr+Pl2:%>шка%>ненк K ;
+Pl2+Ill:%>незэнк K ;

LEXICON ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3
+Pl3:%>нест K ;
+Der/Cmpr+Pl3:%>шка%>нест K ;
+Pl3+Ill:%>незэст K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON COLL-PRON
ламонеть+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
ламонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
ламоненек+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
ламоненк+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
ламонест+Pron+AssocColl:ламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
аламонеть+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
аламонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
аламоненек+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
аламоненк+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
аламонест+Pron+AssocColl:аламо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кавонеть+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кавонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кавоненек+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кавоненк+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кавонест+Pron+AssocColl:каво ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
колмонеть+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
колмонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
колмоненек+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
колмоненк+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
колмонест+Pron+AssocColl:колмо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
ниленеть+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
ниленензэ+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
нилененек+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
нилененк+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
ниленест+Pron+AssocColl:ниле ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
ветенеть+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
ветенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
ветененек+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
ветененк+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
ветенест+Pron+AssocColl:вете ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
котонеть+Pron+AssocColl:кото ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
сисемнеть+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
сисемнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
сисемненек+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
сисемненк+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
сисемнест+Pron+AssocColl:сисем ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
вейксэнеть+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
вейксэнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
вейксэненек+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
вейксэненк+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
вейксэнест+Pron+AssocColl:вейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кевейкеенеть+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кевейкеенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кевейкеененек+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кевейкеененк+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кевейкеенест+Pron+AssocColl:кевейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кемголмовонеть+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кемголмовонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кемголмовоненек+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кемголмовоненк+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кемголмовонест+Pron+AssocColl:кемголмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кеветеенеть+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кеветеенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кеветеененек+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кеветеененк+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кеветеенест+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кемзисемгенеть+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кемзисемгенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кемзисемгененек+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кемзисемгененк+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кемзисемгенест+Pron+AssocColl:кемзисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кевейксэнеть+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кевейксэнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кевейксэненек+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кевейксэненк+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кевейксэнест+Pron+AssocColl:кевейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
комсьвейкеенеть+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
комсьвейкеенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
комсьвейкеененек+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
комсьвейкеененк+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
комсьвейкеенест+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейкее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
комськолмовонеть+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
комськолмовонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
комськолмовоненек+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
комськолмовоненк+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
комськолмовонест+Pron+AssocColl:комськолмово ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кеветеенеть+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кеветеенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кеветеененек+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кеветеененк+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кеветеенест+Pron+AssocColl:кеветее ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
комсьсисемгенеть+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
комсьсисемгенензэ+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
комсьсисемгененек+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
комсьсисемгененк+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
комсьсисемгенест+Pron+AssocColl:комсьсисемге ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
комсьвейксэнеть+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
комсьвейксэнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
комсьвейксэненек+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
комсьвейксэненк+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
комсьвейксэнест+Pron+AssocColl:комсьвейксэ ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
ниленьгеменнеть+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
ниленьгеменнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
ниленьгеменненек+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
ниленьгеменненк+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
ниленьгеменнест+Pron+AssocColl:ниленьгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кодгеменнеть+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кодгеменнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кодгеменненек+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кодгеменненк+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кодгеменнест+Pron+AssocColl:кодгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кавксоньгеменнеть+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кавксоньгеменнензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кавксоньгеменненек+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кавксоньгеменненк+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кавксоньгеменнест+Pron+AssocColl:кавксоньгемен ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
сядонеть+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
сядонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
сядоненек+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
сядоненк+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
сядонест+Pron+AssocColl:сядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
колмосядонеть+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
колмосядонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
колмосядоненек+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
колмосядоненк+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
колмосядонест+Pron+AssocColl:колмосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
нилесядонеть+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
нилесядонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
нилесядоненек+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
нилесядоненк+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
нилесядонест+Pron+AssocColl:нилесядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
котосядонеть+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
котосядонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
котосядоненек+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
котосядоненк+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
котосядонест+Pron+AssocColl:котосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
кавксосядонеть+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
кавксосядонензэ+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
кавксосядоненек+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
кавксосядоненк+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
кавксосядонест+Pron+AssocColl:кавксосядо ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
тёжаннеть+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG2 ;
тёжаннензэ+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-SG3 ;
тёжанненек+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL1 ;
тёжанненк+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL2 ;
тёжаннест+Pron+AssocColl:тёжан ASSOC-COLL-PRON-PL3 ;
